Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 to 4 of this  2017 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 348.750
to 348.757.
SECTION 2. ORS 348.750 to  348.757 shall be known and may be cited as Oregon’s Open
Educational Resources (OER) Program.
SECTION 3. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall regularly  convene
faculty, staff and librarians from public universities listed in ORS 352.002 and community
colleges for the purpose of coordinating Oregon’s Open Educational Resources (OER) Pro-
gram by:
(a) Assisting and advising faculty at  public universities and community colleges on the
adoption, implementation and storage of open educational resource materials that are
transferable between public universities and community colleges;
(b) Determining  whether to develop a statewide repository of open educational resource
materials for the purpose of supporting the program and, if applicable, developing a plan  for
the development of the repository; and
(c) Developing criteria that may be used to  provide up to $150,000 to public universities
and community colleges for the purpose of increasing the creation, adoption or implementa-
tion of open educational resources.
(2) The commission may enter into contracts or  agreements with public or private enti-
ties for the purpose of fulfilling its obligations under this section.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall  provide a report
on Oregon’s Open Educational Resources (OER) Program to the committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly relating to higher education during each  regular session of the Legislative
Assembly held during an odd-numbered year. The report shall include:
(a) A summary of the current status  of Oregon’s Open Educational Resources (OER)
Program;
(b) A calculation of the amount of moneys students have saved as  a result of the pro-
gram since the previous report filed under this section;
(c) A calculation of the amount of moneys the commission  anticipates future students
will save as a result of the program; and
Enrolled House Bill 2729 (HB 2729-B) Page 1
(d) An evaluation of existing barriers preventing  the adoption of further open educational
resources at public universities listed in ORS 352.002 and community colleges.
(2) Any entity  that enters into a contract or agreement with the commission under sec-
tion 3 of this 2017  Act must collaborate in the creation of each report required under sub-
section (1) of this section.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2017, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $1,000,000 for the purposes of carrying out
Oregon’s Open Educational Resources (OER) Program.
SECTION 6. ORS 348.753 is repealed.
SECTION 7. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2017.
Passed by House July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2729 (HB 2729-B) Page 2